Utah statutes.
70A-5-111.   Remedies.
(1)  If an issuer wrongfully dishonors or repudiates its obligation to pay
money under a letter of credit before presentation, the beneficiary,
successor, or nominated person presenting on its own behalf may recover from
the issuer the amount that is the subject of the dishonor or repudiation.  If
the issuer's obligation under the letter of credit is not for the payment of
money, the claimant may obtain specific performance or, at the claimant's
election, recover an amount equal to the value of performance from the issuer.
In either case, the claimant may also recover incidental but not consequential
damages.  The claimant is not obligated to take action to avoid damages that
might be due from the issuer under this Subsection (1).  If, although not
obligated to do so, the claimant avoids damages, the claimant's recovery from
the issuer must be reduced by the amount of damages avoided.  The issuer has
the burden of proving the amount of damages avoided.  In the case of
repudiation the claimant need not present any document.
(2)  If an issuer wrongfully dishonors a draft or demand presented under a
letter of credit or honors a draft or demand in breach of its obligation to
the applicant, the applicant may recover damages resulting from the breach,
including incidental but not consequential damages, less any amount saved as a
result of the breach.
(3)  If an adviser or nominated person other than a confirmer breaches an
obligation under this chapter or an issuer breaches an obligation not covered
in Subsection (1) or (2), a person to whom the obligation is owed may recover
damages resulting from the breach, including incidental but not consequential
damages, less any amount saved as a result of the breach.  To the extent of
the confirmation, a confirmer has the liability of an issuer specified in this
Subsection (3) and Subsections (1) and (2).
(4)  An issuer, nominated person, or adviser who is found liable under
Subsection (1), (2), or (3) shall pay interest on the amount owed thereunder
from the date of wrongful dishonor or other appropriate date.
(5)  Reasonable attorney's fees and other expenses of litigation must be
awarded to the prevailing party in an action in which a remedy is sought under
this chapter.
(6)  Damages that would otherwise be payable by a party for breach of an
obligation under this chapter may be liquidated by agreement or undertaking,
but only in an amount or by a formula that is reasonable in light of the harm
anticipated.
